Louisiana, session 2026, HB1177.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §4. Applicability
8 This Chapter shall not apply:
9 * * *
10 (65) To any personally identifying information of any person that applies for
11 a lottery hosted by the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries during the season for
12 which the lottery is held.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.